trunk/apertium-eo-es/apertium-eo-es.eo.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="utf-8"?>
<!--
Dictionary:
Sections: 2
Entries: 41345
Sdefs: 95
Paradigms: 74
Last processed by: apertium-dixtools fix apertium-eo-es.eo.dix.new2 apertium-eo-es.eo.dix.new3

-->

<!--
Ordigita per:
apertium-dixtools format apertium-eo-es.eo.dix apertium-eo-es.eo.dix.new
apertium-dixtools sort -ignorecase -alignMonodix -stripEmptyLines -group adj,n,adv,np,vblex,vbtr,vbntr,vbtr_ntr,vb,pr,cnjadv,cnjcoo,n_symbol,adj_symbol,np_symbol,adv_symbol,prn_symbol,det,preadv,rel,itg,det_symbol,num,ij,cnjsub apertium-eo-es.eo.dix.new apertium-eo-es.eo.dix.new2
apertium-dixtools fix apertium-eo-es.eo.dix.new2 apertium-eo-es.eo.dix.new3
-->

<dictionary>
  <alphabet>·ÀÁÂÄÃÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÕŒÙÚÛÜàáâäãçèéêëìíîïñòóôöõœøùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZĈĜĤĴŜŬabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzĉĝĥĵŝŭąĄčČćĆđĐęĘłŁŀĿńŃőŐřšŠśŚžŽźŹżŻÆæØøÅåăĂşșȘțȚıİğĞ</alphabet>
<sdefs>
<sdef n="acc" /> 
<sdef n="nom" /> 
<sdef n="comp" /> 
<sdef n="detnt" /> 
<sdef n="predet" /> 
<sdef n="past" /> 
<sdef n="atn" /> 
<sdef n="qnt" /> 
<sdef n="ord" /> 
<sdef n="obj" /> 
<sdef n="subj" /> 
<sdef n="pro" /> 
<sdef n="tn" /> 
<sdef n="acr" /> 
<sdef n="loc" /> 
<sdef n="ant" /> 
<sdef n="cog" /> 
<sdef n="al" /> 
<sdef n="n" /> 
<sdef n="np" /> 
<sdef n="adj" /> 
<sdef n="pref" /> 
<sdef n="f" /> 
<sdef n="m" /> 
<sdef n="mf" /> 
<sdef n="sg" /> 
<sdef n="pl" /> 
<sdef n="adv" /> 
<sdef n="preadv" /> 
<sdef n="pr" /> 
<sdef n="prn" /> 
<sdef n="rel" /> 
<sdef n="nn" /> 
<sdef n="an" /> 
<sdef n="aa" /> 
<sdef n="ind" /> 
<sdef n="itg" /> 
<sdef n="det" /> 
<sdef n="dem" /> 
<sdef n="def" /> 
<sdef n="cnjcoo" /> 
<sdef n="cnjsub" /> 
<sdef n="cnjadv" /> 
<sdef n="nt" /> 
<sdef n="vaux" /> 
<sdef n="vbser" /> 
<sdef n="vbhaver" /> 
<sdef n="vblex" /> 
<sdef n="vbtr" /> 
<sdef n="vbntr" /> 
<sdef n="vbtr_ntr" /> 
<sdef n="igi" /> 
<sdef n="iĝi" /> 
<sdef n="vbmod" /> 
<sdef n="inf" /> 
<sdef n="ger" /> 
<sdef n="geradj" /> 
<sdef n="gerpast" /> 
<sdef n="pp" /> 
<sdef n="ppres" /> 
<sdef n="pp2" /> 
<sdef n="pp3" /> 
<sdef n="pri" /> 
<sdef n="ifi" /> 
<sdef n="p1" /> 
<sdef n="p2" /> 
<sdef n="p3" /> 
<sdef n="pii" /> 
<sdef n="fti" /> 
<sdef n="fts" /> 
<sdef n="cni" /> 
<sdef n="prs" /> 
<sdef n="pis" /> 
<sdef n="imp" /> 
<sdef n="pos" /> 
<sdef n="gen" /> 
<sdef n="sp" /> 
<sdef n="ref" /> 
<sdef n="sup" /> 
<sdef n="num" /> 
<sdef n="percent" /> 
<sdef n="ciph" /> 
<sdef n="ij" /> 
<sdef n="sent" /> 
<sdef n="cm" /> 
<sdef n="lpar" /> 
<sdef n="rpar" /> 
<sdef n="lquest" /> 
<sdef n="lcit" /> 
<sdef n="rcit" /> 
<sdef n="cit" /> 
<sdef n="web" /> 
<sdef n="subs" /> 
<sdef n="pres" /> 
<sdef n="pprs" /> 
<sdef n="guio" /> 
<sdef n="enc" /> 
<sdef n="vbdo" /> 
<sdef n="sint" /> 
<sdef n="unc" /> 
<sdef n="sep" /> 
<sdef n="pron" /> 
<sdef n="apos" /> 
</sdefs>
<pardefs>

<!-- Formatado de tiu cxi dix:
apertium-dixtools cat -stripEmptyLines -align -alignpardef 30 60 apertium-eo-es.eo.dix apertium-eo-es.eo.dix
-->

<pardef n="ö">
<e>       <p><l>ö</l>         <r>ö</r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>oe</l>        <r>ö</r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ü">
<e>       <p><l>ü</l>         <r>ü</r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>ue</l>        <r>ü</r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="sir__n">
<e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="o__n">
<e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>oj</l>        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>on</l>        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ojn</l>       <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l>on</l>        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="atletik/o__n">
<e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>on</l>        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l>on</l>        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="vokalo__n">
<e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="oj__n">
<e>       <p><l>oj</l>        <r>oj<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ojn</l>       <r>oj<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>



<pardef n="a__adj">
<e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>aj</l>        <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>an</l>        <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ajn</l>       <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l>an</l>        <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ega</l>         <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>egaj</l>        <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>egan</l>        <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>egajn</l>       <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l>ega</l>         <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l>egan</l>        <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l>e</l>         <r>a<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="prefikso__adj">
<e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="prefikso__adv">
<e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="aj__adj">
<e>       <p><l>aj</l>        <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ajn</l>       <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>a<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="eks__pref"> <!-- prefiksoj -->
<e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="pref"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="pref"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="pref"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="pref"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="pref"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="pref"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="eks__adv">
<e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="e__adv">
<e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="nomacc">
<e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="nomacc0">
<e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e r="RL" lm="antaŭ">    <i>antaŭ</i><par n="prefikso__adj"/></e>
<e lm="aŭta">            <i>aŭt</i><par n="a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="basketbalo">      <i>basketbal</i><par n="atletik/o__n"/></e>
<e lm="bogepatroj">      <i>bogepatr</i><par n="oj__n"/></e>
<e lm="bopo">            <i>bop</i><par n="atletik/o__n"/></e>
<e lm="borso">           <i>bors</i><par n="o__n"/></e>
<e lm="re">              <i>re</i><par n="sir__n"/></e>
<e lm="mi">              <i>mi</i><par n="sir__n"/></e>
<e lm="fa">              <i>fa</i><par n="sir__n"/></e>
<e lm="sol">              <i>sol</i><par n="sir__n"/></e>
<e lm="la">              <i>la</i><par n="sir__n"/></e>
<e lm="si">              <i>si</i><par n="sir__n"/></e>
<e lm="D">               <i>D</i><par n="ö"/><i>rler</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e lm="diskoo">          <i>disko</i><par n="atletik/o__n"/></e>
<e lm="don">             <i>don</i><par n="sir__n"/></e>
<e lm="dona">            <i>dona</i><par n="sir__n"/></e>
<e lm="dubasenca">       <i>dubasenc</i><par n="a__adj"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="eks">      <i>eks</i><par n="prefikso__adj"/></e>
<e lm="etero">           <i>eter</i><par n="o__n"/></e>
<e lm="frandaĵoj">       <i>frandaĵ</i><par n="oj__n"/></e>
<e lm="funko">           <i>funk</i><par n="atletik/o__n"/></e>
<e lm="geamantoj">       <i>geamant</i><par n="oj__n"/></e>
<e lm="gebopatroj">      <i>gebopatr</i><par n="oj__n"/></e>
<e lm="gefratoj">        <i>gefrat</i><par n="oj__n"/></e>
<e lm="halfutbalo">      <i>halfutbal</i><par n="atletik/o__n"/></e>
<e lm="hiphopo">         <i>hiphop</i><par n="atletik/o__n"/></e>
<e lm="histerie">        <i>histeri</i><par n="e__adv"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="i">        <i>i</i><par n="vokalo__n"/></e>
<e lm="iksodo">          <i>iksod</i><par n="o__n"/></e>
<e lm="imuna">           <i>imun</i><par n="a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="kontraŭtutmondiĝo"><i>kontraŭtutmondiĝ</i><par n="o__n"/></e>
<e lm="lipharoj">        <i>liphar</i><par n="oj__n"/></e>
<e lm="literatura">      <i>literatur</i><par n="a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="melodramo">       <i>melodram</i><par n="o__n"/></e>
<e lm="metalroko">       <i>metalrok</i><par n="atletik/o__n"/></e>
<e lm="missis">          <i>missis</i><par n="sir__n"/></e>
<e lm="ne tute">         <i>ne<b/>tut</i><par n="e__adv"/></e>
<e lm="nemoveblaĵa">     <i>nemoveblaĵ</i><par n="a__adj"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="nov">      <i>nov</i><par n="prefikso__adj"/></e>
<e lm="Pöttering">       <i>P</i><par n="ö"/><i>ttering</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e lm="pendolo">         <i>pendol</i><par n="o__n"/></e>
<e lm="pluraj">          <i>plur</i><par n="aj__adj"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="por">      <i>por</i><par n="prefikso__adj"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="post">     <i>post</i><par n="prefikso__adj"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="pra">      <i>pra</i><par n="prefikso__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ragtimo">         <i>ragtim</i><par n="atletik/o__n"/></e>
<e lm="ravioloj">        <i>raviol</i><par n="oj__n"/></e>
<e lm="respublika">      <i>respublik</i><par n="a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="rubeolo">         <i>rubeol</i><par n="o__n"/></e>
<e lm="skato">           <i>skat</i><par n="atletik/o__n"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="soci">     <i>soci</i><par n="prefikso__adj"/></e>
<e lm="socie">           <i>soci</i><par n="e__adv"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="super">    <i>super</i><par n="prefikso__adj"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="super">    <i>super</i><par n="prefikso__adv"/></e>
<e lm="ternukso">        <i>ternuks</i><par n="o__n"/></e>
<e lm="transforma">      <i>transform</i><par n="a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="evangeliismo">            <i>evangeliism</i><par n="o__n"/></e>
<e lm="kazaĥa">            <i>kazaĥ</i><par n="a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="faraone">            <i>faraon</i><par n="e__adv"/></e>
<e lm="elektromagnete">            <i>elektromagnet</i><par n="e__adv"/></e>
<e lm="lerneje">            <i>lernej</i><par n="e__adv"/></e>
<e lm="pike">            <i>pik</i><par n="e__adv"/></e>
<e lm="timigite">            <i>timigit</i><par n="e__adv"/></e>
<e lm="porvivaĵoj">            <i>porvivaĵ</i><par n="oj__n"/></e>
